West Virginia, session 2025, HB2247.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. Authorization for Department of health to promulgate legislative rules. §64-5-1. Department of Health. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 30, 2024, authorized under the authority of §16A-3-1 of this code, relating to the Department of Health (laboratories of the Medical Cannabis Program, 64 CSR 111), is authorized.